es: Tipo de saco de boxeo compatible: Saco de agua; Saco tipo maniquí; Saco cobra; Saco de doble extremo; Bola de piso a techo; Saco de pie; Saco de boxeo pesado; Saco de maíz; Saco con pedestal; Almohadilla de golpeo; Maniquí de entrenamiento; Pera de velocidad; Saco de uppercut; Saco de pared; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de saco de boxe compatível: Saco de água; Saco de oponente corporal; Saco cobra; Saco de ponta dupla; Bola de chão ao teto; Saco de pé; Saco de boxe; Saco de milho; Saco com pedestal; Almofada de boxe; Manequim de boxe; Pera de velocidade; Saco de uppercut; Saco de parede; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinamas bokso maišo tipas: Vandens kriaušė; Žmogaus formos manekenas; „Cobra“ tipo kriaušė; Kriaušė su dviem tvirtinimais; Kamuolys tarp grindų ir lubų; Pastatoma kriaušė; Sunki kriaušė; „Maize“ kriaušė; Kriaušė ant stovo; Smūgiavimo pagalvė; Smūgiavimo manekenas; Greičio kriaušė; Apkirtų kriaušė; Sieninė pagalvė; Kita
tr: Uyumlu kum torbası türü: Su dolu kum torbası; İnsan figürlü boks torbası; Kobra boks torbası; Çift taraflı boks topu; Yerden tavana boks topu; Ayaklı kum torbası; Ağır kum torbası; Mısır torbası; Tabanlı kum torbası; Boks yastığı; Boks mankeni; Hız topu; Aparkat torbası; Duvar torbası; Diğer
hu: Kompatibilis bokszzsáktípus: Vizes zsák; Ember alakú bokszzsák; Kobra reflexlabda; Két végén rögzített reflexlabda; Padló és mennyezet közötti labda; Álló bokszzsák; Nehéz bokszzsák; Csepp alakú bokszzsák; Talpas bokszzsák; Bokszpárna; Bokszbábu; Gyorsasági labda; Felütő zsák; Fali zsák; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibel boksesekktype: Aqua-bag; Body opponent bag; Cobra-bag; Dobbelende-bag; Gulv-til-tak-ball; Frittstående boksesekk; Tung boksesekk; Maisbag; Pidestallsekk; Slagpute; Boksedukke; Speedbag; Uppercut-bag; Veggsekk; Annet
de: Kompatibler Boxsacktyp: Aquabag; Body-Opponent-Bag; Cobra-Bag; Doppelendball; Boden-Decken-Ball; Standboxsack; Boxsack; Maisbirne; Pedestal-Bag; Schlagpolster; Boxdummy; Speedball; Uppercut-Boxsack; Wand-Boxsack; Sonstige
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta boksarske vreče: Vodna vreča; Lutka za udarjanje; Vreča Cobra; Dvostranska vreča; Žoga od stropa do tal; Prostostoječa vreča; Težka vreča; Vreča Maize (hruška); Vreča na podstavku; Blazina za udarjanje; Lutka za boks; Hitrostna hruška (speed bag); Vreča za aperkat; Stenska vreča; Drugo
nl: Compatibel bokszaktype: Aquabag; Body Opponent Bag; Cobra-bag; Double-end bag; Vloer-tot-plafondbal; Vrijstaande bokszak; Zware bokszak; Maize bag; Bokszak op voet; Stootkussen; Bokspop; Speedbag; Uppercut-bokszak; Muur-bokszak; Overig
el: Συμβατός τύπος σάκου πυγμαχίας: Σάκος νερού; Σάκος-ανδρείκελο; Σάκος cobra; Σάκος δαπέδου-οροφής; Μπάλα δαπέδου-οροφής; Επιδαπέδιος σάκος; Σάκος βαρέος τύπου; Σάκος slip/maize; Σάκος με βάση; Στόχος χειρός/μαξιλάρι; Ανδρείκελο πυγμαχίας; Αχλάδι ταχύτητας; Σάκος για άπερκατ; Σάκος τοίχου; Άλλο
ja: 互換性のあるパンチングバッグのタイプ: アクアバッグ; ボディオポーネントバッグ; コブラバッグ; ダブルエンドバッグ; フロアトゥシーリングボール; フリースタンディングバッグ; ヘビーバッグ; メイズバッグ; ペデスタルバッグ; パンチパッド; パンチングダミー; スピードバッグ; アッパーカットバッグ; ウォールバッグ; その他
cs: Kompatibilní typ boxovacího pytle: Vodní boxovací pytel; Boxovací panák (BOB); Reflexní pytel Cobra; Boxovací míč na gumě (double-end); Míč od podlahy ke stropu; Volně stojící pytel; Těžký pytel; Kukuřičný pytel; Pytel na podstavci; Boxovací lapa; Boxovací figurína; Boxovací hruška (Speed bag); Pytel na zvedáky (Uppercut bag); Nástěnný pytel; Jiné
sv: Kompatibel typ av boxningssäck: Vattensäck; Slagdocka; Cobra-säck; Double-end bag; Golv-till-tak-boll; Stående slagsäck; Slagsäck; Droppsäck (maize bag); Stående säck (pedestal); Slagkudde; Slagdocka; Päronboll; Uppercutsäck; Väggsäck; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta vreće za udaranje: Vodena vreća (aqua bag); Vreća u obliku tijela (BOB); Cobra vreća; Dvostrana vreća; Lopta od poda do stropa; Samostojeća vreća; Teška vreća; Kukuruzna vreća (maize bag); Vreća s postoljem; Fokusar (punch pad); Lutka za udaranje; Brza kruška; Vreća za aperkat; Zidna vreća; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ boxovacieho vreca: Aqua bag; Boxovací trenažér v tvare postavy (BOB); Cobra bag; Dvojitá boxerská hruška; Loptička upevnená od podlahy k stropu; Voľne stojace boxovacie vrece; Ťažké boxovacie vrece; Boxovacia hruška typu Maize bag; Boxovacie vrece so základňou; Boxovací blok; Boxovacia figurína; Rýchlostná boxovacia hruška; Boxovacie vrece na zdviháky; Nástenné boxovacie vrece; Iné
ko: 호환 샌드백 유형: 아쿠아 백; 바디 오포넌트 백; 코브라 백; 더블엔드 백; 플로어 투 실링 볼; 프리스탠딩 백; 헤비 백; 메이즈 백; 페데스탈 백; 펀치 패드; 펀칭 더미; 스피드 백; 어퍼컷 백; 월 백; 기타
th: ประเภทกระสอบทรายที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: กระสอบทรายน้ำ; กระสอบทรายทรงคน; เป้าชกคอบร้า; ลูกบอลชกมวยแบบแขวน 2 ฝั่ง; ลูกบอลชกมวยตั้งพื้นถึงเพดาน; กระสอบทรายตั้งพื้น; กระสอบทราย; เป้าชกมวยแบบหยดน้ำ; กระสอบทรายฐานตั้งพื้น; เป้าล่อชก; หุ่นชกมวย; สปีดบอล; กระสอบทรายสำหรับอัปเปอร์คัต; เป้าชกมวยติดผนัง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de saco de pancadas compatível: Saco de pancada de água; Boneco de pancada (BOB); Saco reflex (cobra bag); Teto-solo (double-end); Bola teto-solo; Saco de pancada de chão; Saco de pancada pesado; Saco de esquiva (maize bag); Saco de pancada com base; Aparador de soco; Boneco de treinamento; Pera de velocidade (speed bag); Saco para uppercut; Saco de parede; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de sac de box compatibil: Sac cu apă; Manechin de box; Sac Cobra; Minge cu prindere dublă; Minge de antrenament podea-tavan; Sac de box pe suport independent; Sac greu; Sac tip lacrimă (Maize bag); Sac pe piedestal; Pernă de lovituri; Manechin pentru antrenament; Pară de viteză; Sac pentru uppercut; Sac de perete; Altele
ru: Совместимый тип боксерского мешка: Водоналивной мешок; Манекен для битья (BOB); Груша-кобра; Груша на растяжках; Пневмогруша на растяжках (пол-потолок); Напольный мешок; Тяжелый мешок; Мешок-капля; Боксерский мешок на подставке; Боксерская подушка; Тренировочный манекен; Пневмогруша; Апперкотный мешок; Настенная подушка; Другое
fi: Yhteensopiva nyrkkeilysäkkityyppi: Vesisäkki; BOB-nyrkkeilysäkki; Cobra-pallo; Kaksikiinnikkeinen säkki; Lattiasta kattoon -pallo; Vapaasti seisova säkki; Raskas nyrkkeilysäkki; Maissipallo; Jalustallinen säkki; Iskutyyny; Nyrkkeily-dummy; Päärynäpallo; Uppercut-säkki; Seinäsäkki; Muu
zh-TW: 相容拳擊沙袋類型: 水沙袋; 人形沙袋 (BOB); 眼鏡蛇反射球; 天地球; 落地連頂式速度球; 立式沙袋; 重型沙袋; 玉米沙袋; 底座沙袋; 拳靶; 拳擊假人; 速度球; 上勾拳沙袋; 壁掛式沙袋; 其他
pl: Kompatybilny typ worka treningowego: Worek wodny; Worek treningowy w kształcie postaci (BOB); Gruszka bokserska Cobra; Gruszka refleksyjna; Piłka refleksyjna (podłoga-sufit); Worek stojący; Worek treningowy ciężki; Worek bokserski typu maize bag; Worek treningowy na podstawie; Tarcza treningowa; Manekin treningowy; Gruszka szybkościowa; Worek hakowy; Worek ścienny; Inne
vi: Loại bao đấm tương thích: Bao cát nước (Aqua bag); Bao cát hình người (BOB); Bao cát lò xo (Cobra bag); Bóng phản xạ hai đầu; Bóng phản xạ nối sàn - trần; Bao cát đứng; Bao cát nặng; Bao cát quả lê (Maize bag); Bao cát có đế; Đích đấm (Punch pad); Ma-nơ-canh tập đấm; Bóng phản xạ; Bao cát uppercut; Bao cát treo tường; Khác
it: Tipo di sacco da boxe compatibile: Sacco ad acqua; Sacco da boxe a forma di busto; Sacco reflex (Cobra); Palla tesa; Palla terra-tetto; Sacco da terra; Sacco pesante; Sacco a goccia (Maize); Sacco con piedistallo; Cuscino da muro; Manichino da boxe; Pera veloce; Sacco per montanti; Sacco a muro; Altro
en: Compatible punching bag type: Aqua bag; Body opponent bag; Cobra bag; Double-end bag; Floor-to-ceiling ball; Freestanding bag; Heavy bag; Maize bag; Pedestal bag; Punch pad; Punching dummy; Speed bag; Uppercut bag; Wall bag; Other
zh-CN: 适用的拳击沙袋类型: 拳击水袋; 人形沙袋; 眼镜蛇反应靶; 天地沙袋; 天地反弹球; 立式沙袋; 重型沙袋; 玉米沙袋; 底座沙袋; 拳击手靶; 拳击人偶靶; 速度球; 上勾拳沙袋; 墙靶; 其他
da: Kompatibel bokseboldtype: Vandfyldt boksesæk; Boksedukke (BOB); Cobra-sæk; Double end-bold; Gulv-til-loft-bold; Fritstående boksesæk; Tung boksesæk; Majssæk; Boksesæk på fod; Slagpude; Boksedukke; Speedbag; Uppercut-boksesæk; Vægboksesæk; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместим тип боксов чувал: Водна круша; Тренировъчен манекен (BOB); Кобра круша; Круша на два ластика; Топка за под и таван; Свободностояща круша; Тежка круша; Круша тип капка (Maize bag); Круша на пиедестал; Боксова лапа; Боксов манекен; Бърза круша; Круша за ъперкът; Стенна възглавница; Друго
fr: Type de sac de frappe compatible: Sac à eau; Buste de frappe; Sac Cobra; Ballon double élastique; Balle sol-plafond; Sac de frappe sur pied; Sac de frappe lourd; Poire d'esquive; Sac sur socle; Coussin de frappe; Mannequin de frappe; Poire de vitesse; Sac à uppercut; Sac mural; Autre